Montana, session 2025, HB937.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Commissioner to display insurers -- website. (1) To better assist
consumers in finding insurance coverage, the commissioner shall list all admitted insurance carriers and
insurance producers in good standing to sell insurance for the admitted carrier on the commissioner's website.
The list must:
(a) display the information in a randomized order daily on the home page;
(b) organize the information by the classifications of insurance that may be required by a
consumer;
(c) include search fields within each classification; and
(d) include any category or search term deemed necessary to assist consumers in finding
insurance coverage.
(2) The commissioner may not assess a fee to insurers or producers to administer the list.
(3) The list as provided in this section is intended to be a list of admitted insurers and insurance
producers and may not serve as advertising. The commissioner may not receive compensation to advertise a
particular insurer or producer. The commissioner shall notify insurers and insurance producers about the
website and how to submit contact information, including updates to contact information.

- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 937

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 937.1
NEW SECTION. Section 2. Appropriation. There is appropriated $10,000 from the general fund to
the commissioner of insurance for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for the purpose of establishing the list
of admitted insurers and producers as provided in [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 33, chapter 1, and the provisions of Title 33, chapter 1, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 937